Illinois, session 104th, SB1773.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Sections 102, 204, 206, and 208 and by 6adding Section 309.1 as follows: 7    (720 ILCS 570/102)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1102)8    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-881)9    Sec. 102. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 10context otherwise requires: 11    (a) "Addict" means any person who habitually uses any 12drug, chemical, substance or dangerous drug other than alcohol 13so as to endanger the public morals, health, safety or welfare 14or who is so far addicted to the use of a dangerous drug or 15controlled substance other than alcohol as to have lost the 16power of self control with reference to his or her addiction. 17    (b) "Administer" means the direct application of a 18controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, 19ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient, 20research subject, or animal (as defined by the Humane 21Euthanasia in Animal Shelters Act) by: 22        (1) a practitioner (or, in his or her presence, by his 23    or her authorized agent),   SB1773 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (2) the patient or research subject pursuant to an 2    order, or 3        (3) a euthanasia technician as defined by the Humane 4    Euthanasia in Animal Shelters Act. 5    (c) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf 6of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, 7dispenser, prescriber, or practitioner. It does not include a 8common or contract carrier, public warehouseman or employee of 9the carrier or warehouseman. 10    (c-1) "Anabolic Steroids" means any drug or hormonal 11substance, chemically and pharmacologically related to 12testosterone (other than estrogens, progestins, 13corticosteroids, and dehydroepiandrosterone), and includes: 14    (i) 3[beta],17-dihydroxy-5a-androstane, 15    (ii) 3[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5a-androstane, 16    (iii) 5[alpha]-androstan-3,17-dione, 17    (iv) 1-androstenediol (3[beta], 18        17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene), 19    (v) 1-androstenediol (3[alpha], 20        17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene), 21    (vi) 4-androstenediol  22        (3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-4-ene), 23    (vii) 5-androstenediol  24        (3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene), 25    (viii) 1-androstenedione  26        ([5alpha]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione),   SB1773 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (ix) 4-androstenedione  2        (androst-4-en-3,17-dione), 3    (x) 5-androstenedione  4        (androst-5-en-3,17-dione), 5    (xi) bolasterone (7[alpha],17a-dimethyl-17[beta]- 6        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 7    (xii) boldenone (17[beta]-hydroxyandrost- 8        1,4,-diene-3-one), 9    (xiii) boldione (androsta-1,4- 10        diene-3,17-dione), 11    (xiv) calusterone (7[beta],17[alpha]-dimethyl-17 12        [beta]-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 13    (xv) clostebol (4-chloro-17[beta]- 14        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 15    (xvi) dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro- 16        17[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl- 17        androst-1,4-dien-3-one), 18    (xvii) desoxymethyltestosterone 19    (17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha] 20        -androst-2-en-17[beta]-ol)(a.k.a., madol), 21    (xviii) [delta]1-dihydrotestosterone (a.k.a.  22        '1-testosterone') (17[beta]-hydroxy- 23        5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one), 24    (xix) 4-dihydrotestosterone (17[beta]-hydroxy- 25        androstan-3-one), 26    (xx) drostanolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2[alpha]-methyl-   SB1773 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 2    (xxi) ethylestrenol (17[alpha]-ethyl-17[beta]- 3        hydroxyestr-4-ene), 4    (xxii) fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17[alpha]-methyl- 5        1[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 6    (xxiii) formebolone (2-formyl-17[alpha]-methyl-11[alpha], 7        17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one), 8    (xxiv) furazabol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 9        hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-furazan), 10    (xxv) 13[beta]-ethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one, 11    (xxvi) 4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17[beta]-dihydroxy- 12        androst-4-en-3-one), 13    (xxvii) 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17[beta]- 14        dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-one), 15    (xxviii) mestanolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 16        hydroxy-5-androstan-3-one), 17    (xxix) mesterolone (1amethyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 18        [5a]-androstan-3-one), 19    (xxx) methandienone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 20        hydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one), 21    (xxxi) methandriol (17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],17[beta]- 22        dihydroxyandrost-5-ene), 23    (xxxii) methenolone (1-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 24        5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one), 25    (xxxiii) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta], 17[beta]- 26        dihydroxy-5a-androstane,   SB1773 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (xxxiv) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxy 2        -5a-androstane, 3    (xxxv) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],17[beta]- 4        dihydroxyandrost-4-ene), 5    (xxxvi) 17[alpha]-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17[alpha]- 6        methyl-4-hydroxy-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 7    (xxxvii) methyldienolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 8        hydroxyestra-4,9(10)-dien-3-one), 9    (xxxviii) methyltrienolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 10        hydroxyestra-4,9-11-trien-3-one), 11    (xxxix) methyltestosterone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 12        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 13    (xl) mibolerone (7[alpha],17a-dimethyl-17[beta]- 14        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 15    (xli) 17[alpha]-methyl-[delta]1-dihydrotestosterone  16        (17b[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]- 17        androst-1-en-3-one)(a.k.a. '17-[alpha]-methyl- 18        1-testosterone'), 19    (xlii) nandrolone (17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 20    (xliii) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[beta], 17[beta]- 21        dihydroxyestr-4-ene), 22    (xliv) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[alpha], 17[beta]- 23        dihydroxyestr-4-ene), 24    (xlv) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[beta], 17[beta]- 25        dihydroxyestr-5-ene), 26    (xlvi) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[alpha], 17[beta]-   SB1773 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        dihydroxyestr-5-ene), 2    (xlvii) 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione  3        (estra-4,9(10)-diene-3,17-dione), 4    (xlviii) 19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4- 5        en-3,17-dione), 6    (xlix) 19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5- 7        en-3,17-dione), 8    (l) norbolethone (13[beta], 17a-diethyl-17[beta]- 9        hydroxygon-4-en-3-one), 10    (li) norclostebol (4-chloro-17[beta]- 11        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 12    (lii) norethandrolone (17[alpha]-ethyl-17[beta]- 13        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 14    (liii) normethandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 15        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 16    (liv) oxandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 17        2-oxa-5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 18    (lv) oxymesterone (17[alpha]-methyl-4,17[beta]- 19        dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 20    (lvi) oxymetholone (17[alpha]-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene- 21        17[beta]-hydroxy-(5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 22    (lvii) stanozolol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 23        (5[alpha]-androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole), 24    (lviii) stenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2-methyl- 25        (5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one), 26    (lix) testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17-   SB1773 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic 2        acid lactone), 3    (lx) testosterone (17[beta]-hydroxyandrost- 4        4-en-3-one), 5    (lxi) tetrahydrogestrinone (13[beta], 17[alpha]- 6        diethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon- 7        4,9,11-trien-3-one), 8    (lxii) trenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4,9, 9        11-trien-3-one). 10    Any person who is otherwise lawfully in possession of an 11anabolic steroid, or who otherwise lawfully manufactures, 12distributes, dispenses, delivers, or possesses with intent to 13deliver an anabolic steroid, which anabolic steroid is 14expressly intended for and lawfully allowed to be administered 15through implants to livestock or other nonhuman species, and 16which is approved by the Secretary of Health and Human 17Services for such administration, and which the person intends 18to administer or have administered through such implants, 19shall not be considered to be in unauthorized possession or to 20unlawfully manufacture, distribute, dispense, deliver, or 21possess with intent to deliver such anabolic steroid for 22purposes of this Act. 23    (d) "Administration" means the Drug Enforcement 24Administration, United States Department of Justice, or its 25successor agency. 26    (d-5) "Clinical Director, Prescription Monitoring Program"   SB1773 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1means a Department of Human Services administrative employee 2licensed to either prescribe or dispense controlled substances 3who shall run the clinical aspects of the Department of Human 4Services Prescription Monitoring Program and its Prescription 5Information Library.6    (d-10) "Compounding" means the preparation and mixing of 7components, excluding flavorings, (1) as the result of a 8prescriber's prescription drug order or initiative based on 9the prescriber-patient-pharmacist relationship in the course 10of professional practice or (2) for the purpose of, or 11incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not 12for sale or dispensing. "Compounding" includes the preparation 13of drugs or devices in anticipation of receiving prescription 14drug orders based on routine, regularly observed dispensing 15patterns. Commercially available products may be compounded 16for dispensing to individual patients only if both of the 17following conditions are met: (i) the commercial product is 18not reasonably available from normal distribution channels in 19a timely manner to meet the patient's needs and (ii) the 20prescribing practitioner has requested that the drug be 21compounded. 22    (e) "Control" means to add a drug or other substance, or 23immediate precursor, to a Schedule whether by transfer from 24another Schedule or otherwise. 25    (f) "Controlled Substance" means (i) a drug, substance, 26immediate precursor, or synthetic drug in the Schedules of   SB1773 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1Article II of this Act or (ii) a drug or other substance, or 2immediate precursor, designated as a controlled substance by 3the Department through administrative rule. The term does not 4include distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco, 5as those terms are defined or used in the Liquor Control Act of 61934 and the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995. 7    (f-5) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance:8        (1) the chemical structure of which is substantially 9    similar to the chemical structure of a controlled 10    substance in Schedule I or II;11        (2) which has a stimulant, depressant, or 12    hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system that 13    is substantially similar to or greater than the stimulant, 14    depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central 15    nervous system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or 16    II; or17        (3) with respect to a particular person, which such 18    person represents or intends to have a stimulant, 19    depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central 20    nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater 21    than the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect 22    on the central nervous system of a controlled substance in 23    Schedule I or II. 24    (g) "Counterfeit substance" means a controlled substance, 25which, or the container or labeling of which, without 26authorization bears the trademark, trade name, or other   SB1773 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1identifying mark, imprint, number or device, or any likeness 2thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other 3than the person who in fact manufactured, distributed, or 4dispensed the substance. 5    (h) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive 6or attempted transfer of possession of a controlled substance, 7with or without consideration, whether or not there is an 8agency relationship. "Deliver" or "delivery" does not include 9the donation of drugs to the extent permitted under the 10Illinois Drug Reuse Opportunity Program Act. 11    (i) "Department" means the Illinois Department of Human 12Services (as successor to the Department of Alcoholism and 13Substance Abuse) or its successor agency. 14    (j) (Blank). 15    (k) "Department of Corrections" means the Department of 16Corrections of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 17    (l) "Department of Financial and Professional Regulation" 18means the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation 19of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 20    (m) "Depressant" means any drug that (i) causes an overall 21depression of central nervous system functions, (ii) causes 22impaired consciousness and awareness, and (iii) can be 23habit-forming or lead to a substance abuse problem, including, 24but not limited to, alcohol, cannabis and its active 25principles and their analogs, benzodiazepines and their 26analogs, barbiturates and their analogs, opioids (natural and   SB1773 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1synthetic) and their analogs, and chloral hydrate and similar 2sedative hypnotics. 3    (n) (Blank). 4    (o) "Director" means the Director of the Illinois State 5Police or his or her designated agents. 6    (p) "Dispense" means to deliver a controlled substance to 7an ultimate user or research subject by or pursuant to the 8lawful order of a prescriber, including the prescribing, 9administering, packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary 10to prepare the substance for that delivery. 11    (q) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses. 12    (r) "Distribute" means to deliver, other than by 13administering or dispensing, a controlled substance. 14    (s) "Distributor" means a person who distributes. 15    (t) "Drug" means (1) substances recognized as drugs in the 16official United States Pharmacopoeia, Official Homeopathic 17Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National 18Formulary, or any supplement to any of them; (2) substances 19intended for use in diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or 20prevention of disease in man or animals; (3) substances (other 21than food) intended to affect the structure of any function of 22the body of man or animals and (4) substances intended for use 23as a component of any article specified in clause (1), (2), or 24(3) of this subsection. It does not include devices or their 25components, parts, or accessories. 26    (t-3) "Electronic health record" or "EHR" means an   SB1773 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1electronic record of health-related information on an 2individual that is created, gathered, managed, and consulted 3by authorized health care clinicians and staff. 4    (t-3.5) "Electronic health record system" or "EHR system" 5means any computer-based system or combination of federally 6certified Health IT Modules (defined at 42 CFR 170.102 or its 7successor) used as a repository for electronic health records 8and accessed or updated by a prescriber or authorized 9surrogate in the ordinary course of his or her medical 10practice. For purposes of connecting to the Prescription 11Information Library maintained by the Bureau of Pharmacy and 12Clinical Support Systems or its successor, an EHR system may 13connect to the Prescription Information Library directly or 14through all or part of a computer program or system that is a 15federally certified Health IT Module maintained by a third 16party and used by the EHR system to secure access to the 17database.18    (t-4) "Emergency medical services personnel" has the 19meaning ascribed to it in the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 20Systems Act.21    (t-5) "Euthanasia agency" means an entity certified by the 22Department of Financial and Professional Regulation for the 23purpose of animal euthanasia that holds an animal control 24facility license or animal shelter license under the Animal 25Welfare Act. A euthanasia agency is authorized to purchase, 26store, possess, and utilize Schedule II nonnarcotic and   SB1773 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1Schedule III nonnarcotic drugs for the sole purpose of animal 2euthanasia. 3    (t-10) "Euthanasia drugs" means Schedule II or Schedule 4III substances (nonnarcotic controlled substances) that are 5used by a euthanasia agency for the purpose of animal 6euthanasia. 7    (u) "Good faith" means the prescribing or dispensing of a 8controlled substance by a practitioner in the regular course 9of professional treatment to or for any person who is under his 10or her treatment for a pathology or condition other than that 11individual's physical or psychological dependence upon or 12addiction to a controlled substance, except as provided 13herein: and application of the term to a pharmacist shall mean 14the dispensing of a controlled substance pursuant to the 15prescriber's order which in the professional judgment of the 16pharmacist is lawful. The pharmacist shall be guided by 17accepted professional standards, including, but not limited 18to, the following, in making the judgment: 19        (1) lack of consistency of prescriber-patient 20    relationship, 21        (2) frequency of prescriptions for same drug by one 22    prescriber for large numbers of patients, 23        (3) quantities beyond those normally prescribed, 24        (4) unusual dosages (recognizing that there may be 25    clinical circumstances where more or less than the usual 26    dose may be used legitimately),   SB1773 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (5) unusual geographic distances between patient, 2    pharmacist and prescriber, 3        (6) consistent prescribing of habit-forming drugs. 4    (u-0.5) "Hallucinogen" means a drug that causes markedly 5altered sensory perception leading to hallucinations of any 6type. 7    (u-1) "Home infusion services" means services provided by 8a pharmacy in compounding solutions for direct administration 9to a patient in a private residence, long-term care facility, 10or hospice setting by means of parenteral, intravenous, 11intramuscular, subcutaneous, or intraspinal infusion. 12    (u-5) "Illinois State Police" means the Illinois State 13Police or its successor agency. 14    (v) "Immediate precursor" means a substance: 15        (1) which the Department has found to be and by rule 16    designated as being a principal compound used, or produced 17    primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled 18    substance; 19        (2) which is an immediate chemical intermediary used 20    or likely to be used in the manufacture of such controlled 21    substance; and 22        (3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, 23    curtail or limit the manufacture of such controlled 24    substance. 25    (w) "Instructional activities" means the acts of teaching, 26educating or instructing by practitioners using controlled   SB1773 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1substances within educational facilities approved by the State 2Board of Education or its successor agency. 3    (x) "Local authorities" means a duly organized State, 4County or Municipal peace unit or police force. 5    (y) "Look-alike substance" means a substance, other than a 6controlled substance which (1) by overall dosage unit 7appearance, including shape, color, size, markings or lack 8thereof, taste, consistency, or any other identifying physical 9characteristic of the substance, would lead a reasonable 10person to believe that the substance is a controlled 11substance, or (2) is expressly or impliedly represented to be 12a controlled substance or is distributed under circumstances 13which would lead a reasonable person to believe that the 14substance is a controlled substance. For the purpose of 15determining whether the representations made or the 16circumstances of the distribution would lead a reasonable 17person to believe the substance to be a controlled substance 18under this clause (2) of subsection (y), the court or other 19authority may consider the following factors in addition to 20any other factor that may be relevant: 21        (a) statements made by the owner or person in control 22    of the substance concerning its nature, use or effect; 23        (b) statements made to the buyer or recipient that the 24    substance may be resold for profit; 25        (c) whether the substance is packaged in a manner 26    normally used for the illegal distribution of controlled   SB1773 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    substances; 2        (d) whether the distribution or attempted distribution 3    included an exchange of or demand for money or other 4    property as consideration, and whether the amount of the 5    consideration was substantially greater than the 6    reasonable retail market value of the substance. 7    Clause (1) of this subsection (y) shall not apply to a 8noncontrolled substance in its finished dosage form that was 9initially introduced into commerce prior to the initial 10introduction into commerce of a controlled substance in its 11finished dosage form which it may substantially resemble. 12    Nothing in this subsection (y) prohibits the dispensing or 13distributing of noncontrolled substances by persons authorized 14to dispense and distribute controlled substances under this 15Act, provided that such action would be deemed to be carried 16out in good faith under subsection (u) if the substances 17involved were controlled substances. 18    Nothing in this subsection (y) or in this Act prohibits 19the manufacture, preparation, propagation, compounding, 20processing, packaging, advertising or distribution of a drug 21or drugs by any person registered pursuant to Section 510 of 22the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 360). 23    (y-1) "Mail-order pharmacy" means a pharmacy that is 24located in a state of the United States that delivers, 25dispenses or distributes, through the United States Postal 26Service or other common carrier, to Illinois residents, any   SB1773 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1substance which requires a prescription. 2    (z) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, 3propagation, compounding, conversion or processing of a 4controlled substance other than methamphetamine, either 5directly or indirectly, by extraction from substances of 6natural origin, or independently by means of chemical 7synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical 8synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the 9substance or labeling of its container, except that this term 10does not include: 11        (1) by an ultimate user, the preparation or 12    compounding of a controlled substance for his or her own 13    use; 14        (2) by a practitioner, or his or her authorized agent 15    under his or her supervision, the preparation, 16    compounding, packaging, or labeling of a controlled 17    substance: 18            (a) as an incident to his or her administering or 19        dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of 20        his or her professional practice; or 21            (b) as an incident to lawful research, teaching or 22        chemical analysis and not for sale; or 23        (3) the packaging, repackaging, or labeling of drugs 24    only to the extent permitted under the Illinois Drug Reuse 25    Opportunity Program Act. 26    (z-1) (Blank).   SB1773 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (z-5) "Medication shopping" means the conduct prohibited 2under subsection (a) of Section 314.5 of this Act.3    (z-10) "Mid-level practitioner" means (i) a physician 4assistant who has been delegated authority to prescribe 5through a written delegation of authority by a physician 6licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches, in 7accordance with Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant 8Practice Act of 1987, (ii) an advanced practice registered 9nurse who has been delegated authority to prescribe through a 10written delegation of authority by a physician licensed to 11practice medicine in all of its branches or by a podiatric 12physician, in accordance with Section 65-40 of the Nurse 13Practice Act, (iii) an advanced practice registered nurse 14certified as a nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical 15nurse specialist who has been granted authority to prescribe 16by a hospital affiliate in accordance with Section 65-45 of 17the Nurse Practice Act, (iv) an animal euthanasia agency, or 18(v) a prescribing psychologist. 19    (aa) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether 20produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances 21of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical 22synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical 23synthesis: 24        (1) opium, opiates, derivatives of opium and opiates, 25    including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts 26    of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of   SB1773 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    such isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within 2    the specific chemical designation; however the term 3    "narcotic drug" does not include the isoquinoline 4    alkaloids of opium; 5        (2) (blank); 6        (3) opium poppy and poppy straw; 7        (4) coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of 8    coca leaves from which substantially all of the cocaine 9    and ecgonine, and their isomers, derivatives and salts, 10    have been removed; 11        (5) cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, 12    and salts of isomers;13        (6) ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, 14    and salts of isomers;15        (7) any compound, mixture, or preparation which 16    contains any quantity of any of the substances referred to 17    in subparagraphs (1) through (6). 18    (bb) "Nurse" means a registered nurse licensed under the 19Nurse Practice Act. 20    (cc) (Blank). 21    (dd) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction 22forming or addiction sustaining liability similar to morphine 23or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction 24forming or addiction sustaining liability. 25    (ee) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver 26somniferum L., except its seeds.   SB1773 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (ee-5) "Oral dosage" means a tablet, capsule, elixir, or 2solution or other liquid form of medication intended for 3administration by mouth, but the term does not include a form 4of medication intended for buccal, sublingual, or transmucosal 5administration. 6    (ff) "Parole and Pardon Board" means the Parole and Pardon 7Board of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 8    (gg) "Person" means any individual, corporation, 9mail-order pharmacy, government or governmental subdivision or 10agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or 11association, or any other entity. 12    (hh) "Pharmacist" means any person who holds a license or 13certificate of registration as a registered pharmacist, a 14local registered pharmacist or a registered assistant 15pharmacist under the Pharmacy Practice Act. 16    (ii) "Pharmacy" means any store, ship or other place in 17which pharmacy is authorized to be practiced under the 18Pharmacy Practice Act. 19    (ii-5) "Pharmacy shopping" means the conduct prohibited 20under subsection (b) of Section 314.5 of this Act.21    (ii-10) "Physician" (except when the context otherwise 22requires) means a person licensed to practice medicine in all 23of its branches. 24    (jj) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of 25the opium poppy, after mowing. 26    (kk) "Practitioner" means a physician licensed to practice   SB1773 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1medicine in all its branches, dentist, optometrist, podiatric 2physician, veterinarian, scientific investigator, pharmacist, 3physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, 4licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, emergency medical 5services personnel, hospital, laboratory, or pharmacy, or 6other person licensed, registered, or otherwise lawfully 7permitted by the United States or this State to distribute, 8dispense, conduct research with respect to, administer or use 9in teaching or chemical analysis, a controlled substance in 10the course of professional practice or research. 11    (ll) "Pre-printed prescription" means a written 12prescription upon which the designated drug has been indicated 13prior to the time of issuance; the term does not mean a written 14prescription that is individually generated by machine or 15computer in the prescriber's office. 16    (mm) "Prescriber" means a physician licensed to practice 17medicine in all its branches, dentist, optometrist, 18prescribing psychologist licensed under Section 4.2 of the 19Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act with prescriptive 20authority delegated under Section 4.3 of the Clinical 21Psychologist Licensing Act, podiatric physician, or 22veterinarian who issues a prescription, a physician assistant 23who issues a prescription for a controlled substance in 24accordance with Section 303.05, a written delegation, and a 25written collaborative agreement required under Section 7.5 of 26the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, an advanced   SB1773 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority 2delegated under Section 65-40 of the Nurse Practice Act and in 3accordance with Section 303.05, a written delegation, and a 4written collaborative agreement under Section 65-35 of the 5Nurse Practice Act, an advanced practice registered nurse 6certified as a nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical 7nurse specialist who has been granted authority to prescribe 8by a hospital affiliate in accordance with Section 65-45 of 9the Nurse Practice Act and in accordance with Section 303.05, 10or an advanced practice registered nurse certified as a nurse 11practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who 12has full practice authority pursuant to Section 65-43 of the 13Nurse Practice Act. 14    (nn) "Prescription" means a written, facsimile, or oral 15order, or an electronic order that complies with applicable 16federal requirements, of a physician licensed to practice 17medicine in all its branches, dentist, podiatric physician or 18veterinarian for any controlled substance, of an optometrist 19in accordance with Section 15.1 of the Illinois Optometric 20Practice Act of 1987, of a prescribing psychologist licensed 21under Section 4.2 of the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act 22with prescriptive authority delegated under Section 4.3 of the 23Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, of a physician assistant 24for a controlled substance in accordance with Section 303.05, 25a written delegation, and a written collaborative agreement 26required under Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant Practice   SB1773 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1Act of 1987, of an advanced practice registered nurse with 2prescriptive authority delegated under Section 65-40 of the 3Nurse Practice Act who issues a prescription for a controlled 4substance in accordance with Section 303.05, a written 5delegation, and a written collaborative agreement under 6Section 65-35 of the Nurse Practice Act, of an advanced 7practice registered nurse certified as a nurse practitioner, 8nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who has been 9granted authority to prescribe by a hospital affiliate in 10accordance with Section 65-45 of the Nurse Practice Act and in 11accordance with Section 303.05 when required by law, or of an 12advanced practice registered nurse certified as a nurse 13practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who 14has full practice authority pursuant to Section 65-43 of the 15Nurse Practice Act. 16    (nn-5) "Prescription Information Library" (PIL) means an 17electronic library that contains reported controlled substance 18data.19    (nn-10) "Prescription Monitoring Program" (PMP) means the 20entity that collects, tracks, and stores reported data on 21controlled substances and select drugs pursuant to Section 22316. 23    (oo) "Production" or "produce" means manufacture, 24planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled 25substance other than methamphetamine. 26    (pp) "Registrant" means every person who is required to   SB1773 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1register under Section 302 of this Act. 2    (qq) "Registry number" means the number assigned to each 3person authorized to handle controlled substances under the 4laws of the United States and of this State. 5    (qq-5) "Secretary" means, as the context requires, either 6the Secretary of the Department or the Secretary of the 7Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, and the 8Secretary's designated agents. 9    (rr) "State" includes the State of Illinois and any state, 10district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession thereof, 11and any area subject to the legal authority of the United 12States of America. 13    (rr-5) "Stimulant" means any drug that (i) causes an 14overall excitation of central nervous system functions, (ii) 15causes impaired consciousness and awareness, and (iii) can be 16habit-forming or lead to a substance abuse problem, including, 17but not limited to, amphetamines and their analogs, 18methylphenidate and its analogs, cocaine, and phencyclidine 19and its analogs. 20    (rr-10) "Synthetic drug" includes, but is not limited to, 21any synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines or any synthetic 22cathinones as provided for in Schedule I. 23    (ss) "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses 24a controlled substance for his or her own use or for the use of 25a member of his or her household or for administering to an 26animal owned by him or her or by a member of his or her   SB1773 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1household. 2(Source: P.A. 101-666, eff. 1-1-22; 102-389, eff. 1-1-22; 3102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 4    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-881)5    Sec. 102. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 6context otherwise requires: 7    (a) "Person with a substance use disorder" means any 8person who has a substance use disorder diagnosis defined as a 9spectrum of persistent and recurring problematic behavior that 10encompasses 10 separate classes of drugs: alcohol; caffeine; 11cannabis; hallucinogens; inhalants; opioids; sedatives, 12hypnotics and anxiolytics; stimulants; and tobacco; and other 13unknown substances leading to clinically significant 14impairment or distress. 15    (b) "Administer" means the direct application of a 16controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, 17ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient, 18research subject, or animal (as defined by the Humane 19Euthanasia in Animal Shelters Act) by: 20        (1) a practitioner (or, in his or her presence, by his 21    or her authorized agent), 22        (2) the patient or research subject pursuant to an 23    order, or 24        (3) a euthanasia technician as defined by the Humane 25    Euthanasia in Animal Shelters Act.   SB1773 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (c) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf 2of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, 3dispenser, prescriber, or practitioner. It does not include a 4common or contract carrier, public warehouseman or employee of 5the carrier or warehouseman. 6    (c-1) "Anabolic Steroids" means any drug or hormonal 7substance, chemically and pharmacologically related to 8testosterone (other than estrogens, progestins, 9corticosteroids, and dehydroepiandrosterone), and includes: 10    (i) 3[beta],17-dihydroxy-5a-androstane, 11    (ii) 3[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5a-androstane, 12    (iii) 5[alpha]-androstan-3,17-dione, 13    (iv) 1-androstenediol (3[beta], 14        17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene), 15    (v) 1-androstenediol (3[alpha], 16        17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene), 17    (vi) 4-androstenediol  18        (3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-4-ene), 19    (vii) 5-androstenediol  20        (3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene), 21    (viii) 1-androstenedione  22        ([5alpha]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione), 23    (ix) 4-androstenedione  24        (androst-4-en-3,17-dione), 25    (x) 5-androstenedione  26        (androst-5-en-3,17-dione),   SB1773 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (xi) bolasterone (7[alpha],17a-dimethyl-17[beta]- 2        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 3    (xii) boldenone (17[beta]-hydroxyandrost- 4        1,4,-diene-3-one), 5    (xiii) boldione (androsta-1,4- 6        diene-3,17-dione), 7    (xiv) calusterone (7[beta],17[alpha]-dimethyl-17 8        [beta]-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 9    (xv) clostebol (4-chloro-17[beta]- 10        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 11    (xvi) dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro- 12        17[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl- 13        androst-1,4-dien-3-one), 14    (xvii) desoxymethyltestosterone 15    (17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha] 16        -androst-2-en-17[beta]-ol)(a.k.a., madol), 17    (xviii) [delta]1-dihydrotestosterone (a.k.a.  18        '1-testosterone') (17[beta]-hydroxy- 19        5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one), 20    (xix) 4-dihydrotestosterone (17[beta]-hydroxy- 21        androstan-3-one), 22    (xx) drostanolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2[alpha]-methyl- 23        5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 24    (xxi) ethylestrenol (17[alpha]-ethyl-17[beta]- 25        hydroxyestr-4-ene), 26    (xxii) fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17[alpha]-methyl-   SB1773 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        1[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 2    (xxiii) formebolone (2-formyl-17[alpha]-methyl-11[alpha], 3        17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one), 4    (xxiv) furazabol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 5        hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-furazan), 6    (xxv) 13[beta]-ethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one, 7    (xxvi) 4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17[beta]-dihydroxy- 8        androst-4-en-3-one), 9    (xxvii) 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17[beta]- 10        dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-one), 11    (xxviii) mestanolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 12        hydroxy-5-androstan-3-one), 13    (xxix) mesterolone (1amethyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 14        [5a]-androstan-3-one), 15    (xxx) methandienone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 16        hydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one), 17    (xxxi) methandriol (17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],17[beta]- 18        dihydroxyandrost-5-ene), 19    (xxxii) methenolone (1-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 20        5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one), 21    (xxxiii) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta], 17[beta]- 22        dihydroxy-5a-androstane, 23    (xxxiv) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxy 24        -5a-androstane, 25    (xxxv) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],17[beta]- 26        dihydroxyandrost-4-ene),   SB1773 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (xxxvi) 17[alpha]-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17[alpha]- 2        methyl-4-hydroxy-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 3    (xxxvii) methyldienolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 4        hydroxyestra-4,9(10)-dien-3-one), 5    (xxxviii) methyltrienolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 6        hydroxyestra-4,9-11-trien-3-one), 7    (xxxix) methyltestosterone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 8        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 9    (xl) mibolerone (7[alpha],17a-dimethyl-17[beta]- 10        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 11    (xli) 17[alpha]-methyl-[delta]1-dihydrotestosterone  12        (17b[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]- 13        androst-1-en-3-one)(a.k.a. '17-[alpha]-methyl- 14        1-testosterone'), 15    (xlii) nandrolone (17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 16    (xliii) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[beta], 17[beta]- 17        dihydroxyestr-4-ene), 18    (xliv) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[alpha], 17[beta]- 19        dihydroxyestr-4-ene), 20    (xlv) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[beta], 17[beta]- 21        dihydroxyestr-5-ene), 22    (xlvi) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[alpha], 17[beta]- 23        dihydroxyestr-5-ene), 24    (xlvii) 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione  25        (estra-4,9(10)-diene-3,17-dione), 26    (xlviii) 19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4-   SB1773 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        en-3,17-dione), 2    (xlix) 19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5- 3        en-3,17-dione), 4    (l) norbolethone (13[beta], 17a-diethyl-17[beta]- 5        hydroxygon-4-en-3-one), 6    (li) norclostebol (4-chloro-17[beta]- 7        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 8    (lii) norethandrolone (17[alpha]-ethyl-17[beta]- 9        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 10    (liii) normethandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 11        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 12    (liv) oxandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 13        2-oxa-5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 14    (lv) oxymesterone (17[alpha]-methyl-4,17[beta]- 15        dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 16    (lvi) oxymetholone (17[alpha]-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene- 17        17[beta]-hydroxy-(5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 18    (lvii) stanozolol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 19        (5[alpha]-androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole), 20    (lviii) stenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2-methyl- 21        (5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one), 22    (lix) testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17- 23        secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic 24        acid lactone), 25    (lx) testosterone (17[beta]-hydroxyandrost- 26        4-en-3-one),   SB1773 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (lxi) tetrahydrogestrinone (13[beta], 17[alpha]- 2        diethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon- 3        4,9,11-trien-3-one), 4    (lxii) trenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4,9, 5        11-trien-3-one). 6    Any person who is otherwise lawfully in possession of an 7anabolic steroid, or who otherwise lawfully manufactures, 8distributes, dispenses, delivers, or possesses with intent to 9deliver an anabolic steroid, which anabolic steroid is 10expressly intended for and lawfully allowed to be administered 11through implants to livestock or other nonhuman species, and 12which is approved by the Secretary of Health and Human 13Services for such administration, and which the person intends 14to administer or have administered through such implants, 15shall not be considered to be in unauthorized possession or to 16unlawfully manufacture, distribute, dispense, deliver, or 17possess with intent to deliver such anabolic steroid for 18purposes of this Act. 19    (d) "Administration" means the Drug Enforcement 20Administration, United States Department of Justice, or its 21successor agency. 22    (d-5) "Clinical Director, Prescription Monitoring Program" 23means a Department of Human Services administrative employee 24licensed to either prescribe or dispense controlled substances 25who shall run the clinical aspects of the Department of Human 26Services Prescription Monitoring Program and its Prescription   SB1773 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1Information Library.2    (d-10) "Compounding" means the preparation and mixing of 3components, excluding flavorings, (1) as the result of a 4prescriber's prescription drug order or initiative based on 5the prescriber-patient-pharmacist relationship in the course 6of professional practice or (2) for the purpose of, or 7incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not 8for sale or dispensing. "Compounding" includes the preparation 9of drugs or devices in anticipation of receiving prescription 10drug orders based on routine, regularly observed dispensing 11patterns. Commercially available products may be compounded 12for dispensing to individual patients only if both of the 13following conditions are met: (i) the commercial product is 14not reasonably available from normal distribution channels in 15a timely manner to meet the patient's needs and (ii) the 16prescribing practitioner has requested that the drug be 17compounded. 18    (e) "Control" means to add a drug or other substance, or 19immediate precursor, to a Schedule whether by transfer from 20another Schedule or otherwise. 21    (f) "Controlled Substance" means (i) a drug, substance, 22immediate precursor, or synthetic drug in the Schedules of 23Article II of this Act or (ii) a drug or other substance, or 24immediate precursor, designated as a controlled substance by 25the Department through administrative rule. The term does not 26include distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco,   SB1773 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1as those terms are defined or used in the Liquor Control Act of 21934 and the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995. 3    (f-5) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance:4        (1) the chemical structure of which is substantially 5    similar to the chemical structure of a controlled 6    substance in Schedule I or II;7        (2) which has a stimulant, depressant, or 8    hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system that 9    is substantially similar to or greater than the stimulant, 10    depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central 11    nervous system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or 12    II; or13        (3) with respect to a particular person, which such 14    person represents or intends to have a stimulant, 15    depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central 16    nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater 17    than the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect 18    on the central nervous system of a controlled substance in 19    Schedule I or II. 20    (g) "Counterfeit substance" means a controlled substance, 21which, or the container or labeling of which, without 22authorization bears the trademark, trade name, or other 23identifying mark, imprint, number or device, or any likeness 24thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other 25than the person who in fact manufactured, distributed, or 26dispensed the substance.   SB1773 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (h) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive 2or attempted transfer of possession of a controlled substance, 3with or without consideration, whether or not there is an 4agency relationship. "Deliver" or "delivery" does not include 5the donation of drugs to the extent permitted under the 6Illinois Drug Reuse Opportunity Program Act. 7    (i) "Department" means the Illinois Department of Human 8Services (as successor to the Department of Alcoholism and 9Substance Abuse) or its successor agency. 10    (j) (Blank). 11    (k) "Department of Corrections" means the Department of 12Corrections of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 13    (l) "Department of Financial and Professional Regulation" 14means the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation 15of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 16    (m) "Depressant" means any drug that (i) causes an overall 17depression of central nervous system functions, (ii) causes 18impaired consciousness and awareness, and (iii) can be 19habit-forming or lead to a substance misuse or substance use 20disorder, including, but not limited to, alcohol, cannabis and 21its active principles and their analogs, benzodiazepines and 22their analogs, barbiturates and their analogs, opioids 23(natural and synthetic) and their analogs, and chloral hydrate 24and similar sedative hypnotics. 25    (n) (Blank). 26    (o) "Director" means the Director of the Illinois State   SB1773 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1Police or his or her designated agents. 2    (p) "Dispense" means to deliver a controlled substance to 3an ultimate user or research subject by or pursuant to the 4lawful order of a prescriber, including the prescribing, 5administering, packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary 6to prepare the substance for that delivery. 7    (q) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses. 8    (r) "Distribute" means to deliver, other than by 9administering or dispensing, a controlled substance. 10    (s) "Distributor" means a person who distributes. 11    (t) "Drug" means (1) substances recognized as drugs in the 12official United States Pharmacopoeia, Official Homeopathic 13Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National 14Formulary, or any supplement to any of them; (2) substances 15intended for use in diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or 16prevention of disease in man or animals; (3) substances (other 17than food) intended to affect the structure of any function of 18the body of man or animals and (4) substances intended for use 19as a component of any article specified in clause (1), (2), or 20(3) of this subsection. It does not include devices or their 21components, parts, or accessories. 22    (t-3) "Electronic health record" or "EHR" means an 23electronic record of health-related information on an 24individual that is created, gathered, managed, and consulted 25by authorized health care clinicians and staff. 26    (t-3.5) "Electronic health record system" or "EHR system"   SB1773 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1means any computer-based system or combination of federally 2certified Health IT Modules (defined at 42 CFR 170.102 or its 3successor) used as a repository for electronic health records 4and accessed or updated by a prescriber or authorized 5surrogate in the ordinary course of his or her medical 6practice. For purposes of connecting to the Prescription 7Information Library maintained by the Bureau of Pharmacy and 8Clinical Support Systems or its successor, an EHR system may 9connect to the Prescription Information Library directly or 10through all or part of a computer program or system that is a 11federally certified Health IT Module maintained by a third 12party and used by the EHR system to secure access to the 13database.14    (t-4) "Emergency medical services personnel" has the 15meaning ascribed to it in the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 16Systems Act.17    (t-5) "Euthanasia agency" means an entity certified by the 18Department of Financial and Professional Regulation for the 19purpose of animal euthanasia that holds an animal control 20facility license or animal shelter license under the Animal 21Welfare Act. A euthanasia agency is authorized to purchase, 22store, possess, and utilize Schedule II nonnarcotic and 23Schedule III nonnarcotic drugs for the sole purpose of animal 24euthanasia. 25    (t-10) "Euthanasia drugs" means Schedule II or Schedule 26III substances (nonnarcotic controlled substances) that are   SB1773 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1used by a euthanasia agency for the purpose of animal 2euthanasia. 3    (u) "Good faith" means the prescribing or dispensing of a 4controlled substance by a practitioner in the regular course 5of professional treatment to or for any person who is under his 6or her treatment for a pathology or condition other than that 7individual's physical or psychological dependence upon a 8controlled substance, except as provided herein: and 9application of the term to a pharmacist shall mean the 10dispensing of a controlled substance pursuant to the 11prescriber's order which in the professional judgment of the 12pharmacist is lawful. The pharmacist shall be guided by 13accepted professional standards, including, but not limited 14to, the following, in making the judgment: 15        (1) lack of consistency of prescriber-patient 16    relationship, 17        (2) frequency of prescriptions for same drug by one 18    prescriber for large numbers of patients, 19        (3) quantities beyond those normally prescribed, 20        (4) unusual dosages (recognizing that there may be 21    clinical circumstances where more or less than the usual 22    dose may be used legitimately), 23        (5) unusual geographic distances between patient, 24    pharmacist and prescriber, 25        (6) consistent prescribing of habit-forming drugs. 26    (u-0.5) "Hallucinogen" means a drug that causes markedly   SB1773 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1altered sensory perception leading to hallucinations of any 2type. 3    (u-1) "Home infusion services" means services provided by 4a pharmacy in compounding solutions for direct administration 5to a patient in a private residence, long-term care facility, 6or hospice setting by means of parenteral, intravenous, 7intramuscular, subcutaneous, or intraspinal infusion. 8    (u-5) "Illinois State Police" means the Illinois State 9Police or its successor agency. 10    (v) "Immediate precursor" means a substance: 11        (1) which the Department has found to be and by rule 12    designated as being a principal compound used, or produced 13    primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled 14    substance; 15        (2) which is an immediate chemical intermediary used 16    or likely to be used in the manufacture of such controlled 17    substance; and 18        (3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, 19    curtail or limit the manufacture of such controlled 20    substance. 21    (w) "Instructional activities" means the acts of teaching, 22educating or instructing by practitioners using controlled 23substances within educational facilities approved by the State 24Board of Education or its successor agency. 25    (w-1) "Isomer" means optical isomer, unless specifically 26detailed in this Act.   SB1773 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (x) "Local authorities" means a duly organized State, 2County or Municipal peace unit or police force. 3    (y) "Look-alike substance" means a substance, other than a 4controlled substance which (1) by overall dosage unit 5appearance, including shape, color, size, markings or lack 6thereof, taste, consistency, or any other identifying physical 7characteristic of the substance, would lead a reasonable 8person to believe that the substance is a controlled 9substance, or (2) is expressly or impliedly represented to be 10a controlled substance or is distributed under circumstances 11which would lead a reasonable person to believe that the 12substance is a controlled substance. For the purpose of 13determining whether the representations made or the 14circumstances of the distribution would lead a reasonable 15person to believe the substance to be a controlled substance 16under this clause (2) of subsection (y), the court or other 17authority may consider the following factors in addition to 18any other factor that may be relevant: 19        (a) statements made by the owner or person in control 20    of the substance concerning its nature, use or effect; 21        (b) statements made to the buyer or recipient that the 22    substance may be resold for profit; 23        (c) whether the substance is packaged in a manner 24    normally used for the illegal distribution of controlled 25    substances; 26        (d) whether the distribution or attempted distribution   SB1773 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    included an exchange of or demand for money or other 2    property as consideration, and whether the amount of the 3    consideration was substantially greater than the 4    reasonable retail market value of the substance. 5    Clause (1) of this subsection (y) shall not apply to a 6noncontrolled substance in its finished dosage form that was 7initially introduced into commerce prior to the initial 8introduction into commerce of a controlled substance in its 9finished dosage form which it may substantially resemble. 10    Nothing in this subsection (y) prohibits the dispensing or 11distributing of noncontrolled substances by persons authorized 12to dispense and distribute controlled substances under this 13Act, provided that such action would be deemed to be carried 14out in good faith under subsection (u) if the substances 15involved were controlled substances. 16    Nothing in this subsection (y) or in this Act prohibits 17the manufacture, preparation, propagation, compounding, 18processing, packaging, advertising or distribution of a drug 19or drugs by any person registered pursuant to Section 510 of 20the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 360). 21    (y-1) "Mail-order pharmacy" means a pharmacy that is 22located in a state of the United States that delivers, 23dispenses or distributes, through the United States Postal 24Service or other common carrier, to Illinois residents, any 25substance which requires a prescription. 26    (z) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation,   SB1773 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1propagation, compounding, conversion or processing of a 2controlled substance other than methamphetamine, either 3directly or indirectly, by extraction from substances of 4natural origin, or independently by means of chemical 5synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical 6synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the 7substance or labeling of its container, except that this term 8does not include: 9        (1) by an ultimate user, the preparation or 10    compounding of a controlled substance for his or her own 11    use; 12        (2) by a practitioner, or his or her authorized agent 13    under his or her supervision, the preparation, 14    compounding, packaging, or labeling of a controlled 15    substance: 16            (a) as an incident to his or her administering or 17        dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of 18        his or her professional practice; or 19            (b) as an incident to lawful research, teaching or 20        chemical analysis and not for sale; or 21        (3) the packaging, repackaging, or labeling of drugs 22    only to the extent permitted under the Illinois Drug Reuse 23    Opportunity Program Act. 24    (z-1) (Blank). 25    (z-5) "Medication shopping" means the conduct prohibited 26under subsection (a) of Section 314.5 of this Act.  SB1773 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (z-10) "Mid-level practitioner" means (i) a physician 2assistant who has been delegated authority to prescribe 3through a written delegation of authority by a physician 4licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches, in 5accordance with Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant 6Practice Act of 1987, (ii) an advanced practice registered 7nurse who has been delegated authority to prescribe through a 8written delegation of authority by a physician licensed to 9practice medicine in all of its branches or by a podiatric 10physician, in accordance with Section 65-40 of the Nurse 11Practice Act, (iii) an advanced practice registered nurse 12certified as a nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical 13nurse specialist who has been granted authority to prescribe 14by a hospital affiliate in accordance with Section 65-45 of 15the Nurse Practice Act, (iv) an animal euthanasia agency, or 16(v) a prescribing psychologist. 17    (aa) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether 18produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances 19of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical 20synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical 21synthesis: 22        (1) opium, opiates, derivatives of opium and opiates, 23    including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts 24    of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of 25    such isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within 26    the specific chemical designation; however the term   SB1773 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    "narcotic drug" does not include the isoquinoline 2    alkaloids of opium; 3        (2) (blank); 4        (3) opium poppy and poppy straw; 5        (4) coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of 6    coca leaves from which substantially all of the cocaine 7    and ecgonine, and their isomers, derivatives and salts, 8    have been removed; 9        (5) cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, 10    and salts of isomers;11        (6) ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, 12    and salts of isomers;13        (7) any compound, mixture, or preparation which 14    contains any quantity of any of the substances referred to 15    in subparagraphs (1) through (6). 16    (bb) "Nurse" means a registered nurse licensed under the 17Nurse Practice Act. 18    (cc) (Blank). 19    (dd) "Opiate" means a drug derived from or related to 20opium. 21    (ee) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver 22somniferum L., except its seeds. 23    (ee-5) "Oral dosage" means a tablet, capsule, elixir, or 24solution or other liquid form of medication intended for 25administration by mouth, but the term does not include a form 26of medication intended for buccal, sublingual, or transmucosal   SB1773 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1administration. 2    (ff) "Parole and Pardon Board" means the Parole and Pardon 3Board of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 4    (gg) "Person" means any individual, corporation, 5mail-order pharmacy, government or governmental subdivision or 6agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or 7association, or any other entity. 8    (hh) "Pharmacist" means any person who holds a license or 9certificate of registration as a registered pharmacist, a 10local registered pharmacist or a registered assistant 11pharmacist under the Pharmacy Practice Act. 12    (ii) "Pharmacy" means any store, ship or other place in 13which pharmacy is authorized to be practiced under the 14Pharmacy Practice Act. 15    (ii-5) "Pharmacy shopping" means the conduct prohibited 16under subsection (b) of Section 314.5 of this Act.17    (ii-10) "Physician" (except when the context otherwise 18requires) means a person licensed to practice medicine in all 19of its branches. 20    (jj) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of 21the opium poppy, after mowing. 22    (kk) "Practitioner" means a physician licensed to practice 23medicine in all its branches, dentist, optometrist, podiatric 24physician, veterinarian, scientific investigator, pharmacist, 25physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, 26licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, emergency medical   SB1773 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1services personnel, hospital, laboratory, or pharmacy, or 2other person licensed, registered, or otherwise lawfully 3permitted by the United States or this State to distribute, 4dispense, conduct research with respect to, administer or use 5in teaching or chemical analysis, a controlled substance in 6the course of professional practice or research. 7    (ll) "Pre-printed prescription" means a written 8prescription upon which the designated drug has been indicated 9prior to the time of issuance; the term does not mean a written 10prescription that is individually generated by machine or 11computer in the prescriber's office. 12    (mm) "Prescriber" means a physician licensed to practice 13medicine in all its branches, dentist, optometrist, 14prescribing psychologist licensed under Section 4.2 of the 15Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act with prescriptive 16authority delegated under Section 4.3 of the Clinical 17Psychologist Licensing Act, podiatric physician, or 18veterinarian who issues a prescription, a physician assistant 19who issues a prescription for a controlled substance in 20accordance with Section 303.05, a written delegation, and a 21written collaborative agreement required under Section 7.5 of 22the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, an advanced 23practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority 24delegated under Section 65-40 of the Nurse Practice Act and in 25accordance with Section 303.05, a written delegation, and a 26written collaborative agreement under Section 65-35 of the   SB1773 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1Nurse Practice Act, an advanced practice registered nurse 2certified as a nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical 3nurse specialist who has been granted authority to prescribe 4by a hospital affiliate in accordance with Section 65-45 of 5the Nurse Practice Act and in accordance with Section 303.05, 6or an advanced practice registered nurse certified as a nurse 7practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who 8has full practice authority pursuant to Section 65-43 of the 9Nurse Practice Act. 10    (nn) "Prescription" means a written, facsimile, or oral 11order, or an electronic order that complies with applicable 12federal requirements, of a physician licensed to practice 13medicine in all its branches, dentist, podiatric physician or 14veterinarian for any controlled substance, of an optometrist 15in accordance with Section 15.1 of the Illinois Optometric 16Practice Act of 1987, of a prescribing psychologist licensed 17under Section 4.2 of the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act 18with prescriptive authority delegated under Section 4.3 of the 19Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, of a physician assistant 20for a controlled substance in accordance with Section 303.05, 21a written delegation, and a written collaborative agreement 22required under Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant Practice 23Act of 1987, of an advanced practice registered nurse with 24prescriptive authority delegated under Section 65-40 of the 25Nurse Practice Act who issues a prescription for a controlled 26substance in accordance with Section 303.05, a written   SB1773 Engrossed- 47 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1delegation, and a written collaborative agreement under 2Section 65-35 of the Nurse Practice Act, of an advanced 3practice registered nurse certified as a nurse practitioner, 4nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who has been 5granted authority to prescribe by a hospital affiliate in 6accordance with Section 65-45 of the Nurse Practice Act and in 7accordance with Section 303.05 when required by law, or of an 8advanced practice registered nurse certified as a nurse 9practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who 10has full practice authority pursuant to Section 65-43 of the 11Nurse Practice Act. 12    (nn-5) "Prescription Information Library" (PIL) means an 13electronic library that contains reported controlled substance 14data.15    (nn-10) "Prescription Monitoring Program" (PMP) means the 16entity that collects, tracks, and stores reported data on 17controlled substances and select drugs pursuant to Section 18316. 19    (oo) "Production" or "produce" means manufacture, 20planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled 21substance other than methamphetamine. 22    (pp) "Registrant" means every person who is required to 23register under Section 302 of this Act. 24    (qq) "Registry number" means the number assigned to each 25person authorized to handle controlled substances under the 26laws of the United States and of this State.   SB1773 Engrossed- 48 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (qq-5) "Secretary" means, as the context requires, either 2the Secretary of the Department or the Secretary of the 3Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, and the 4Secretary's designated agents. 5    (rr) "State" includes the State of Illinois and any state, 6district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession thereof, 7and any area subject to the legal authority of the United 8States of America. 9    (rr-5) "Stimulant" means any drug that (i) causes an 10overall excitation of central nervous system functions, (ii) 11causes impaired consciousness and awareness, and (iii) can be 12habit-forming or lead to a substance use disorder, including, 13but not limited to, amphetamines and their analogs, 14methylphenidate and its analogs, cocaine, and phencyclidine 15and its analogs. 16    (rr-10) "Synthetic drug" includes, but is not limited to, 17any synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines or any synthetic 18cathinones as provided for in Schedule I. 19    (ss) "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses 20a controlled substance for his or her own use or for the use of 21a member of his or her household or for administering to an 22animal owned by him or her or by a member of his or her 23household. 24(Source: P.A. 102-389, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 25102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-881, eff. 1-1-25.)   SB1773 Engrossed- 49 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (720 ILCS 570/204)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1204)2    Sec. 204. (a) The controlled substances listed in this 3Section are included in Schedule I.4    (b) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 5another schedule, any of the following opiates, including 6their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, 7esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of such isomers, 8esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific 9chemical designation:10        (1) Acetylmethadol;11        (1.1) (Blank); Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl12    (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)- 13    4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);14        (2) Allylprodine;15        (3) Alphacetylmethadol, except 16    levo-alphacetylmethadol (also known as levo-alpha- 17    acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM);18        (4) Alphameprodine;19        (5) Alphamethadol;20        (6) Alpha-methylfentanyl 21    (N-(1-alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl) 22    propionanilide;  1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N- 23    propanilido) piperidine;24        (6.1) (Blank); Alpha-methylthiofentanyl 25    (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl- 26    4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);  SB1773 Engrossed- 50 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (7) 1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine (MPPP);2        (7.1) PEPAP 3    (1-(2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);4        (8) Benzethidine;5        (9) Betacetylmethadol;6        (9.1) (Blank); Beta-hydroxyfentanyl 7    (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)- 8    4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);9        (10) Betameprodine;10        (11) Betamethadol;11        (12) Betaprodine;12        (12.1) Brorphine; 13        (13) Clonitazene;14        (14) Dextromoramide;15        (15) Diampromide;16        (16) Diethylthiambutene;17        (17) Difenoxin;18        (18) Dimenoxadol;19        (19) Dimepheptanol;20        (20) Dimethylthiambutene;21        (21) Dioxaphetylbutyrate;22        (22) Dipipanone;23        (23) Ethylmethylthiambutene;24        (24) Etonitazene;25        (25) Etoxeridine;26        (25.1) Flunitazene;   SB1773 Engrossed- 51 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (26) Furethidine;2        (27) Hydroxpethidine;3        (27.1) Isotonitazene; 4        (28) Ketobemidone;5        (29) Levomoramide;6        (30) Levophenacylmorphan;7        (31) (Blank); 3-Methylfentanyl 8    (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)- 9    4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);10        (31.1) (Blank); 3-Methylthiofentanyl 11    (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl- 12    4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);13        (31.2) Metonitazene; 14        (32) Morpheridine;15        (33) Noracymethadol;16        (34) Norlevorphanol;17        (35) Normethadone;18        (36) Norpipanone;19        (36.1) (Blank); Para-fluorofentanyl 20    (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)- 21    4-piperidinyl]propanamide);22        (37) Phenadoxone;23        (38) Phenampromide;24        (39) Phenomorphan;25        (40) Phenoperidine;26        (41) Piritramide;  SB1773 Engrossed- 52 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (42) Proheptazine;2        (43) Properidine;3        (44) Propiram;4        (45) Racemoramide;5        (45.1) (Blank); Thiofentanyl 6    (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl- 7    4-piperidinyl]-propanamide);8        (46) Tilidine;9        (47) Trimeperidine;10        (48) (Blank); Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (other 11name: 12    N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]- 13    N-phenylpropanamide);14        (49) (Blank); Furanyl fentanyl (FU-F);15        (50) (Blank); Butyryl fentanyl;16        (51) (Blank); Valeryl fentanyl;17        (52) (Blank); Acetyl fentanyl;18        (53) (Blank); Beta-hydroxy-thiofentanyl; 19        (54) 3,4-dichloro-N-[2- 20    (dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N- 21    methylbenzamide (U-47700); 22        (55) 4-chloro-N-[1-[2- 23    (4-nitrophenyl)ethyl]-2-piperidinylidene]- 24    benzenesulfonamide (W-18); 25        (56) 4-chloro-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl) 26    -2-piperidinylidene]-benzenesulfonamide (W-15);   SB1773 Engrossed- 53 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (57) (Blank). acrylfentanyl (acryloylfentanyl). 2    (c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 3another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives, its 4salts, isomers and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of 5such salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within 6the specific chemical designation:7        (1) Acetorphine;8        (2) Acetyldihydrocodeine;9        (3) Benzylmorphine;10        (4) Codeine methylbromide;11        (5) Codeine-N-Oxide;12        (6) Cyprenorphine;13        (7) Desomorphine;14        (8) Diacetyldihydromorphine (Dihydroheroin);15        (9) Dihydromorphine;16        (10) Drotebanol;17        (11) Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);18        (12) Heroin;19        (13) Hydromorphinol;20        (14) Methyldesorphine;21        (15) Methyldihydromorphine;22        (16) Morphine methylbromide;23        (17) Morphine methylsulfonate;24        (18) Morphine-N-Oxide;25        (19) Myrophine;26        (20) Nicocodeine;  SB1773 Engrossed- 54 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (21) Nicomorphine;2        (22) Normorphine;3        (23) Pholcodine;4        (24) Thebacon.5    (d) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 6another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 7preparation which contains any quantity of the following 8hallucinogenic substances, or which contains any of its salts, 9isomers and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of such 10salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the 11specific chemical designation (for the purposes of this 12paragraph only, the term "isomer" includes the optical, 13position and geometric isomers):14        (1) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine 15    (alpha-methyl,3,4-methylenedioxyphenethylamine, 16    methylenedioxyamphetamine, MDA);17        (1.1) Alpha-ethyltryptamine18    (some trade or other names: etryptamine;19    MONASE; alpha-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine;20    3-(2-aminobutyl)indole; a-ET; and AET);21        (2) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);22        (2.1) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine 23    (also known as: N-ethyl-alpha-methyl- 24    3,4(methylenedioxy) Phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, 25    and MDEA);26        (2.2) (Blank); N-Benzylpiperazine (BZP);   SB1773 Engrossed- 55 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (2.2-1) (Blank); Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine 2    (TFMPP); 3        (3) 3-methoxy-4,5-methylenedioxyamphetamine, (MMDA);4        (4) 3,4,5-trimethoxyamphetamine (TMA);5        (5) (Blank);6        (6) Diethyltryptamine (DET);7        (7) Dimethyltryptamine (DMT);8        (7.1) 5-Methoxy-diallyltryptamine; 9        (8) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine (DOM, STP);10        (9) Ibogaine  (some trade and other names: 11    7-ethyl-6,6,beta,7,8,9,10,12,13-octahydro-2-methoxy- 12    6,9-methano-5H-pyrido [1',2':1,2] azepino [5,4-b] 13    indole; Tabernanthe iboga);14        (10) Lysergic acid diethylamide;15        (10.1) Salvinorin A; 16        (10.5) Salvia divinorum (meaning all parts of the 17    plant presently classified botanically as Salvia 18    divinorum, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any 19    extract from any part of that plant, and every compound, 20    manufacture, salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever 21    the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers 22    is possible within the specific chemical designation, 23    derivative, mixture, or preparation of that plant, its 24    seeds or extracts); 25        (11) 3,4,5-trimethoxyphenethylamine (Mescaline);26        (12) Peyote (meaning all parts of the plant presently   SB1773 Engrossed- 56 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    classified botanically as Lophophora williamsii Lemaire, 2    whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract 3    from any part of that plant, and every compound, 4    manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation of 5    that plant, its seeds or extracts);6        (13) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate (JB 318);7        (14) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;8        (14.1) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine 9    (also known as N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl- 10    3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine and N-hydroxy MDA);11        (15) Parahexyl; some trade or other names: 12    3-hexyl-1-hydroxy-7,8,9,10-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-6H- 13    dibenzo (b,d) pyran; Synhexyl;14        (16) Psilocybin;15        (17) Psilocyn;16        (18) Alpha-methyltryptamine (AMT);17        (19) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine 18    (2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA);19        (20) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine 20    (4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 21    4-bromo-2,5-DMA);22        (20.1) 4-Bromo-2,5 dimethoxyphenethylamine. 23    Some trade or other names: 2-(4-bromo- 24    2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; 25    alpha-desmethyl DOB, 2CB, Nexus;26        (21) 4-methoxyamphetamine SB1773 Engrossed- 57 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (4-methoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 2    paramethoxyamphetamine; PMA);3        (22) (Blank);4        (23) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine. 5    Some trade or other names: 6    N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine, 7    (1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, 8    N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE;9        (24) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine. Some trade 10    or other names: 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) pyrrolidine, PCPy, 11    PHP;12        (25) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;13        (26) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine 14    (another name: DOET);15        (27) 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl] pyrrolidine 16    (another name: TCPy);17        (28) (Blank);18        (29) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine (some trade 19    or other names: 1-[1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine; 20    2-thienyl analog of phencyclidine; TPCP; TCP);21        (29.1) Benzothiophene analog of phencyclidine. Some 22    trade or other names: BTCP or benocyclidine;23        (29.2) 3-Methoxyphencyclidine (3-MeO-PCP); 24        (30) Bufotenine (some trade or other names: 25    3-(Beta-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole; 26    3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol; SB1773 Engrossed- 58 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    5-hydroxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine; 2    N,N-dimethylserotonin; mappine);3        (31) (Blank);  4        (32) (Blank);  5        (33) (Blank);  6        (34) (Blank); 7        (34.5) (Blank);  8        (35) (6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-9    (2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7, 10    10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol11    Some trade or other names: HU-210; 12        (35.5)  (6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6- 13    dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a- 14    tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol, its isomers,  15    salts, and salts of isomers; Some trade or other  16    names: HU-210, Dexanabinol; 17        (36) Dexanabinol, (6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-18    6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)- 19    6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol20    Some trade or other names: HU-211;21        (37) (Blank); 22        (38) (Blank); 23        (39) (Blank); 24        (40) (Blank); 25        (41) (Blank); 26        (42) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from   SB1773 Engrossed- 59 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    3-(1-naphthoyl)indole or 2    1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane by substitution at the 3    nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 4    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 5    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 6    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted 7    in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 8    substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples 9    of this structural class include, but are not limited to, 10    JWH-018, AM-2201, JWH-175, JWH-184, and JWH-185;11        (43) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from 12    3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole by substitution at the nitrogen 13    atom of the pyrrole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 14    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 15    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 16    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 17    in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not 18    substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples 19    of this structural class include, but are not limited to, 20    JWH-030, JWH-145, JWH-146, JWH-307, and JWH-368; 21        (44) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from 22    1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene by substitution at the 23    3-position of the indene ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 24    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 25    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 26    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted   SB1773 Engrossed- 60 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    in the indene ring to any extent, whether or not 2    substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples 3    of this structural class include, but are not limited to, 4    JWH-176; 5        (45) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from 6    3-phenylacetylindole by substitution at the nitrogen atom 7    of the indole ring with alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 8    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 9    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 10    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 11    in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 12    substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of 13    this structural class include, but are not limited to, 14    JWH-167, JWH-250, JWH-251, and RCS-8; 15        (46) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from 16    2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by substitution at the 17    5-position of the phenolic ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 18    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 19    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 20    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not substituted in the 21    cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural 22    class include, but are not limited to, CP 47, 497 and its 23    C8 homologue (cannabicyclohexanol); 24        (46.1) (Blank); Any compound structurally derived from 25    3-(benzoyl) indole with substitution at the nitrogen atom 26    of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,   SB1773 Engrossed- 61 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 2    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 3    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further 4    substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether 5    or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. 6    Examples of this structural class include, but are not 7    limited to, AM-630, AM-2233, AM-694, Pravadoline (WIN 8    48,098), and RCS-4; 9        (47) (Blank); 10        (48) (Blank); 11        (49) (Blank); 12        (50) (Blank); 13        (51) (Blank); 14        (52) (Blank); 15        (53) 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthio-phenethylamine. 16    Some trade or other names: 2C-T-7; 17        (53.1) 4-ethyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. Some 18    trade or other names: 2C-E; 19        (53.2) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-methylphenethylamine. Some 20    trade or other names: 2C-D; 21        (53.3) 4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. Some 22    trade or other names: 2C-C; 23        (53.4) 4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. Some trade 24    or other names: 2C-I; 25        (53.5) 4-ethylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. Some 26    trade or other names: 2C-T-2;   SB1773 Engrossed- 62 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (53.6) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-isopropylthio-phenethylamine. 2    Some trade or other names: 2C-T-4; 3        (53.7) 2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. Some trade or 4    other names: 2C-H; 5        (53.8) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitrophenethylamine. Some 6    trade or other names: 2C-N; 7        (53.9) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenethylamine. Some 8    trade or other names: 2C-P; 9        (53.10) 2,5-dimethoxy-3,4-dimethylphenethylamine. 10    Some trade or other names: 2C-G; 11        (53.11) The N-(2-methoxybenzyl) derivative of any 2C 12    phenethylamine referred to in subparagraphs (20.1), (53), 13    (53.1), (53.2), (53.3), (53.4), (53.5), (53.6), (53.7), 14    (53.8), (53.9), and (53.10) including, but not limited to, 15    25I-NBOMe and 25C-NBOMe; 16        (54) 5-Methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine; 17        (55) (Blank); 18        (56) (Blank); 19        (57) (Blank); 20        (58) (Blank); 21        (59) (Blank); 3-cyclopropoylindole with substitution 22    at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, 23    haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 24    aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 25    1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 26    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted   SB1773 Engrossed- 63 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    on the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 2    substituted on the cyclopropyl ring to any extent: 3    including, but not limited to, XLR11, UR144, FUB-144; 4        (60) (Blank); 3-adamantoylindole with substitution at 5    the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 6    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 7    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 8    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 9    on the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 10    substituted on the adamantyl ring to any extent: 11    including, but not limited to, AB-001; 12        (61) (Blank); N-(adamantyl)-indole-3-carboxamide with 13    substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by 14    alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 15    cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 16    1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 17    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 18    on the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 19    substituted on the adamantyl ring to any extent: 20    including, but not limited to, APICA/2NE-1, STS-135; 21        (62) (Blank); N-(adamantyl)-indazole-3-carboxamide 22    with substitution at a nitrogen atom of the indazole ring 23    by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 24    cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 25    1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 26    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted   SB1773 Engrossed- 64 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    on the indazole ring to any extent, whether or not 2    substituted on the adamantyl ring to any extent: 3    including, but not limited to, AKB48, 5F-AKB48; 4        (63) (Blank); 1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 5    8-quinolinyl ester with substitution at the nitrogen atom 6    of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 7    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 8    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 9    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 10    on the indole ring to any extent, whether or not 11    substituted on the quinoline ring to any extent: 12    including, but not limited to, PB22, 5F-PB22, FUB-PB-22; 13        (64) (Blank); 3-(1-naphthoyl)indazole with 14    substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by 15    alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 16    cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 17    1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 18    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 19    on the indazole ring to any extent, whether or not 20    substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent: including, 21    but not limited to, THJ-018, THJ-2201; 22        (65) (Blank); 2-(1-naphthoyl)benzimidazole with 23    substitution at the nitrogen atom of the benzimidazole 24    ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 25    cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 26    1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or   SB1773 Engrossed- 65 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 2    on the benzimidazole ring to any extent, whether or not 3    substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent: including, 4    but not limited to, FUBIMINA; 5        (66) (Blank); N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)- 6    1H-indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 7    nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 8    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 9    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 10    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 11    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 12    limited to, AB-PINACA, AB-FUBINACA, AB-CHMINACA; 13        (67) (Blank); N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan- 14    2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 15    nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 16    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 17    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 18    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 19    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 20    limited to, ADB-PINACA, ADB-FUBINACA; 21        (68) (Blank); N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan- 22    2-yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 23    nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 24    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 25    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 26    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted   SB1773 Engrossed- 66 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    on the indole ring to any extent: including, but not 2    limited to, ADBICA, 5F-ADBICA; 3        (69) (Blank); N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2 -4    yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 5    nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 6    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 7    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 8    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 9    on the indole ring to any extent: including, but not 10    limited to, ABICA, 5F-ABICA; 11        (70) (Blank); Methyl 2-(1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3- 12    methylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen atom of 13    the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 14    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 15    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 16    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 17    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 18    limited to, AMB, 5F-AMB; 19        (71) (Blank); Methyl 2-(1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)- 20    3,3-dimethylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen 21    atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 22    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 23    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 24    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 25    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 26    limited to, 5-fluoro-MDMB-PINACA, MDMB-FUBINACA;   SB1773 Engrossed- 67 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (72) (Blank); Methyl 2-(1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3- 2    methylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen atom of 3    the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 4    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 5    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 6    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 7    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 8    limited to, MMB018, MMB2201, and AMB-CHMICA; 9        (73) (Blank); Methyl 2-(1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3- 10    dimethylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen atom 11    of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 12    cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl 13    halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 14    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 15    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 16    limited to, MDMB-CHMICA; 17        (74) (Blank); N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan- 18    2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 19    nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 20    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 21    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 22    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 23    on the indazole ring to any     extent: including, but not 24    limited to, APP-CHMINACA, 5-fluoro-APP-PINACA; 25        (75) (Blank); N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan- 26    2-yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the   SB1773 Engrossed- 68 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 2    alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, 3    alkyl aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 4    2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted 5    on the indazole ring to any extent: including, but not 6    limited to, APP-PICA and 5-fluoro-APP-PICA; 7        (76) 4-Acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine: trade name 8    4-AcO-DMT;9        (77) 5-Methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine: trade 10    name 5-MeO-MIPT;11        (78) 4-hydroxy Diethyltryptamine (4-HO-DET);12        (79) 4-hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine (4-HO-MET);13        (80) 4-hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (4-HO-DiPT);14        (81) 4-hydroxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine 15    (4-HO-MiPT); 16        (82) (Blank); Fluorophenylpiperazine;17        (83) Methoxetamine;18        (84) 1-(Ethylamino)-2-phenylpropan-2-one (iso- 19    ethcathinone). 20    (e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 21another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 22preparation which contains any quantity of the following 23substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous 24system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers 25whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of 26isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:  SB1773 Engrossed- 69 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (1) mecloqualone;2        (2) methaqualone; and3        (3) gamma hydroxybutyric acid.4    (f) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 5another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 6preparation which contains any quantity of the following 7substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous 8system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:9        (1) Fenethylline;10        (2) N-ethylamphetamine;11        (3) Aminorex (some other names: 12    2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; aminoxaphen; 13    4-5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine) and its 14    salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;15        (4) Methcathinone (some other names: 16    2-methylamino-1-phenylpropan-1-one; 17    Ephedrone; 2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; 18    alpha-(methylamino)propiophenone; N-methylcathinone; 19    methycathinone; Monomethylpropion; UR 1431) and its 20    salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;21        (5) Cathinone (some trade or other names: 22    2-aminopropiophenone; alpha-aminopropiophenone; 23    2-amino-1-phenyl-propanone; norephedrone);24        (6) N,N-dimethylamphetamine (also known as: 25    N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; 26    N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine);  SB1773 Engrossed- 70 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (7) (+ or -) cis-4-methylaminorex  ((+ or -) cis- 2    4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-4-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);3        (8) 3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV); 4        (9) Halogenated amphetamines and 5    methamphetamines - any compound derived from either 6    amphetamine or methamphetamine through the substitution 7    of a halogen on the phenyl ring, including, but not 8    limited to, 2-fluoroamphetamine, 3- 9    fluoroamphetamine and 4-fluoroamphetamine; 10        (10) Aminopropylbenzofuran (APB): 11    including 4-(2-Aminopropyl) benzofuran, 5- 12    (2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran, 6-(2-Aminopropyl) 13    benzofuran, and 7-(2-Aminopropyl) benzofuran; 14        (11) Aminopropyldihydrobenzofuran (APDB): 15    including 4-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3- dihydrobenzofuran, 16    5-(2-Aminopropyl)-2, 3-dihydrobenzofuran, 17    6-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran, 18    and 7-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran; 19        (12) Methylaminopropylbenzofuran 20    (MAPB): including 4-(2-methylaminopropyl) 21    benzofuran, 5-(2-methylaminopropyl)benzofuran, 22    6-(2-methylaminopropyl)benzofuran 23    and 7-(2-methylaminopropyl)benzofuran; . 24        (13) Methylaminopropyldihydrobenzofuran 25    (MAPDB): including 1-(2,3-dihydrobenzofuran-5-yl)- 26    N-methylpropan-2-amine.   SB1773 Engrossed- 71 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (g) Temporary listing of substances subject to emergency 2scheduling. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation 3that contains any quantity of the following substances:4        (1) N-[1-benzyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide 5    (benzylfentanyl), its optical isomers, isomers, salts, and 6    salts of isomers;7        (2) N-[1(2-thienyl) methyl-4-piperidyl]-N- 8    phenylpropanamide (thenylfentanyl), its optical isomers, 9    salts, and salts of isomers.10    (h) Synthetic cathinones. Unless specifically excepted, 11any chemical compound which is not approved by the United 12States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, is not 13dispensed or possessed in accordance with State or federal 14law, not including bupropion, structurally derived from 152-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with 16either phenyl, naphthyl, or thiophene ring systems, whether or 17not the compound is further modified in one or more of the 18following ways: 19        (1) by substitution in the ring system to any extent 20    with alkyl, alkylenedioxy, alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or 21    halide substituents, whether or not further substituted in 22    the ring system by one or more other univalent 23    substituents. Examples of this class include, but are not 24    limited to, 3,4-Methylenedioxycathinone (bk-MDA); 25        (2) by substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic 26    alkyl substituent. Examples of this class include, but are   SB1773 Engrossed- 72 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    not limited to, 2-methylamino-1-phenylbutan-1-one 2    (buphedrone); or 3        (3) by substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with 4    alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, or methoxybenzyl groups, or by 5    inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic 6    structure. Examples of this class include, but are not 7    limited to, Dimethylcathinone, Ethcathinone, and 8    a-Pyrrolidinopropiophenone (a-PPP); or 9    Any other synthetic cathinone which is not approved by the 10United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, is 11not dispensed or possessed in accordance with State or federal 12law. 13    (i) Synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines. Any synthetic 14cannabinoid or piperazine which is not approved by the United 15States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, which is 16not dispensed or possessed in accordance with State and 17federal law.18        (1) As used in this Section, "synthetic cannabinoid" 19    includes, but is not limited to, any compound, as 20    identified in a report from an accredited forensic 21    laboratory, that is structurally derived from any one or 22    more of the following compounds:23            (A) Any compound structurally derived from 24        3-(1-naphthoyl)indole or 25        1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane by substitution at 26        the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl,   SB1773 Engrossed- 73 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 2        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 3        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 4        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further 5        substituted in the indole ring to any extent, whether 6        or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. 7        Examples of this structural class include, but are not 8        limited to, JWH-018, AM-2201, JWH-175, JWH-184, and 9        JWH-185;10            (B) 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole by substitution at the 11        nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 12        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 13        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 14        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 15        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 16        substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether 17        or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. 18        Examples of this structural class include, but are not 19        limited to, JWH-030, JWH-145, JWH-146, JWH-307, and 20        JWH-368;21            (C) 1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene by substitution at 22        the 3-position of the indene ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 23        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 24        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 25        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 26        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further   SB1773 Engrossed- 74 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        substituted in the indene ring to any extent, whether 2        or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. 3        Examples of this structural class include, but are not 4        limited to, JWH-176;5            (D) 3-phenylacetylindole by substitution at the 6        nitrogen atom of the indole ring with alkyl, 7        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 8        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 9        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 10        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 11        substituted in the indole ring to any extent, whether 12        or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. 13        Examples of this structural class include, but are not 14        limited to, JWH-167, JWH-250, JWH-251, and RCS-8;15            (E) 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by substitution 16        at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by alkyl, 17        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 18        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 19        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 20        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not substituted in 21        the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Examples of this 22        structural class include, but are not limited to, CP 23        47, 497 and its C8 homologue (cannabicyclohexanol);24            (F) 3-(benzoyl) indole with substitution at the 25        nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, 26        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,   SB1773 Engrossed- 75 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 2        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 3        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further 4        substituted in the indole ring to any extent and 5        whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any 6        extent. Examples of this structural class include, but 7        are not limited to, AM-630, AM-2233, AM-694, 8        Pravadoline (WIN 48,098), and RCS-4;9            (G) 3-cyclopropoylindole with substitution at the 10        nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 11        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 12        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 13        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 14        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 15        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, whether 16        or not substituted on the cyclopropyl ring to any 17        extent, including, but not limited to, XLR11, UR144, 18        FUB-144;19            (H) 3-adamantoylindole with substitution at the 20        nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 21        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 22        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 23        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 24        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 25        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, whether 26        or not substituted on the adamantyl ring to any   SB1773 Engrossed- 76 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        extent, including, but not limited to, AB-001;2            (I) N-(adamantyl)-indole-3-carboxamide with 3        substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring 4        by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 5        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 6        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 7        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 8        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, whether 9        or not substituted on the adamantyl ring to any 10        extent, including, but not limited to, APICA/2NE-1, 11        STS-135;12            (J) N-(adamantyl)-indazole-3-carboxamide with 13        substitution at a nitrogen atom of the indazole ring 14        by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 15        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 16        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 17        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 18        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 19        whether or not substituted on the adamantyl ring to 20        any extent, including, but not limited to, AKB48, 21        5F-AKB48;22            (K) 1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl ester 23        with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole 24        ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 25        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 26        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or   SB1773 Engrossed- 77 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 2        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, whether 3        or not substituted on the quinoline ring to any 4        extent, including, but not limited to, PB22, 5F-PB22, 5        FUB-PB-22;6            (L) 3-(1-naphthoyl)indazole with substitution at 7        the nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, 8        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 9        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 10        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 11        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 12        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 13        whether or not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any 14        extent, including, but not limited to, THJ-018, 15        THJ-2201;16            (M) 2-(1-naphthoyl)benzimidazole with 17        substitution at the nitrogen atom of the benzimidazole 18        ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 19        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 20        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 21        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 22        substituted on the benzimidazole ring to any extent, 23        whether or not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any 24        extent, including, but not limited to, FUBIMINA;25            (N) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1H- 26        indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the   SB1773 Engrossed- 78 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, 2        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 3        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 4        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 5        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 6        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 7        including, but not limited to, AB-PINACA, AB-FUBINACA, 8        AB-CHMINACA;9            (O) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)- 10        1H-indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 11        nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, 12        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 13        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 14        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 15        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 16        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 17        including, but not limited to, ADB-PINACA, 18        ADB-FUBINACA;19            (P) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)- 20        1H-indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 21        nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 22        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 23        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 24        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 25        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 26        substituted on the indole ring to any extent,   SB1773 Engrossed- 79 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        including, but not limited to, ADBICA, 5F-ADBICA;2            (Q) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1H- 3        indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the nitrogen 4        atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 5        cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl 6        aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 7        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 8        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, 9        including, but not limited to, ABICA, 5F-ABICA;10            (R) Methyl 2-(1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)- 11        3-methylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen 12        atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 13        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 14        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 15        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 16        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 17        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 18        including, but not limited to, AMB, 5F-AMB;19            (S) Methyl 2-(1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)- 20        3,3-dimethylbutanoate with substitution on the 21        nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, 22        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 23        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 24        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 25        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 26        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent,   SB1773 Engrossed- 80 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        including, but not limited to, 5-fluoro-MDMB-PINACA, 2        MDMB-FUBINACA;3            (T) Methyl 2-(1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3- 4        methylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen atom 5        of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 6        cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl 7        aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 8        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 9        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, 10        including, but not limited to, MMB018, MMB2201, and 11        AMB-CHMICA;12            (U) Methyl 2-(1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3- 13        dimethylbutanoate with substitution on the nitrogen 14        atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 15        cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl 16        aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 17        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 18        substituted on the indazole indole ring to any extent, 19        including, but not limited to, MDMB-CHMICA;20            (V) N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H- 21        indazole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 22        nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, 23        haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, 24        cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, 25        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 26        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further   SB1773 Engrossed- 81 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        substituted on the indazole ring to any extent, 2        including, but not limited to, APP-CHMINACA, 3        5-fluoro-APP-PINACA;4            (W) N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)- 5        1H-indole-3-carboxamide with substitution on the 6        nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, 7        alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl 8        halide, alkyl aryl halide, 9        1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 10        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 11        substituted on the indole ring to any extent, 12        including, but not limited to, APP-PICA and 13        5-fluoro-APP-PICA;14            (X) 1H-indazole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl 15        ester with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the 16        indazole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, 17        cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, aryl halide, alkyl 18        aryl halide, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 19        2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further 20        substituted on the inazdole ring to any extent, 21        whether or not substituted on the quinoline ring to 22        any extent, including, but not limited to, SDB-005, 23        5-F-SDB-005;24        (2) As used in this Section, "synthetic piperazine" 25    includes, but is not limited to, any of the following 26    compounds and their positional isomers:  SB1773 Engrossed- 82 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1            (A) N-Benzylpiperazine (BZP);2            (B) Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine (TFMPP);3            (C) Fluorophenylpiperazine;4            (D) Chlorophenylpiperazine. 5    (j) Unless specifically excepted or listed in another 6schedule, any chemical compound which is not approved by the 7United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, is 8not dispensed or possessed in accordance with State or federal 9law, and is derived from the following structural classes and 10their salts:11        (1) Benzodiazepine class: A fused 1,4-diazepine and 12    benzene ring structure with a phenyl connected to the 13    1,4-diazepine ring, with any substitution(s) or 14    replacement(s) on the 1,4-diazepine or benzene ring, any 15    substitution(s) on the phenyl ring, or any combination 16    thereof. Examples of this class include but are not 17    limited to: Clonazolam, Flualprazolam; or18        (2) Thienodiazepine class: A fused 1,4-diazepine and 19    thiophene ring structure with a phenyl connected to the 20    1,4-diazepine ring, with any substitution(s) or 21    replacement(s) on the 1,4-diazepine or thiophene ring, any 22    substitution(s) on the phenyl ring, or any combination 23    thereof. Examples of this class include but are not 24    limited to: Etizolam. 25    (k) Fentanyl-related substances.26        (1) As used in this Section, "fentanyl-related   SB1773 Engrossed- 83 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    substance" means any compound, as identified in a report 2    from an accredited forensic laboratory, unless 3    specifically excepted or listed under another schedule, 4    that is not approved by the United States Food and Drug 5    Administration or, if approved, is not dispensed or 6    possessed in accordance with State or federal law and that 7    is structurally derived from fentanyl 8    (N-phenyl-N-(1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl)- 9    propanamide) by one or more of the following 10    modifications:11            (A) replacement of the phenyl portion of the 12        phenethyl group by any monocycle, whether or not 13        further substituted in or on the monocycle;14            (B) substitution in or on the phenethyl group with 15        alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, 16        amino, or nitro groups;17            (C) substitution in or on the piperidine ring with 18        alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, ester, ether, hydroxyl, halo, 19        haloalkyl, amino, or nitro groups;20            (D) replacement of the aniline ring with any 21        aromatic monocycle whether or not further substituted 22        in or on the aromatic monocycle; or23            (E) replacement of the N-propionyl group by 24        another acyl group.25        (2) "Fentanyl-related substance" includes, but is not 26    limited to, the following substances:  SB1773 Engrossed- 84 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1            (A) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl;2            (B) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-(1-alpha-methyl-beta- 3        phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl) propionanilide; 4        1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido) 5        piperidine;6            (C) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2- 7        thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);8            (D) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2- 9        phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide10            (E) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2- 11        phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);12            (F) 3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1- 13        (2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);14            (G) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)- 15        N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]propanamide);16            (H) Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl- 17        4-piperidinyl]-propanamide);18            (I) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (other name: 19        N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl- 20        4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);21            (J) Furanyl fentanyl (FU-F);22            (K) Butyryl fentanyl;23            (L) Valeryl fentanyl;24            (M) Acetyl fentanyl;25            (N) Beta-hydroxy-thiofentanyl;26            (O) Acrylfentanyl (acryloylfentanyl);  SB1773 Engrossed- 85 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1            (P) Cyclopropyl fentanyl;2            (Q) Crotonyl fentanyl;3            (R) Methoxyacetyl fentanyl;4            (S) Pentanoyl fentanyl;5            (T) Cyclopentyl fentanyl;6            (U) Isobutyryl fentanyl;7            (V) Benzodioxolefentanyl;8            (W) Tetrahydrofuran fentanyl. 9(Source: P.A. 103-245, eff. 1-1-24.) 10    (720 ILCS 570/206)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1206)11    Sec. 206. (a) The controlled substances listed in this 12Section are included in Schedule II.13    (b) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 14another schedule, any of the following substances whether 15produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances 16of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical 17synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical 18synthesis:19        (1) Opium and opiates, and any salt, compound, 20    derivative or preparation of opium or opiate, excluding 21    apomorphine, dextrorphan, levopropoxyphene, nalbuphine, 22    nalmefene, naloxone, and naltrexone, and their respective 23    salts, but including the following:24            (i) Raw Opium;25            (ii) Opium extracts;  SB1773 Engrossed- 86 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1            (iii) Opium fluid extracts;2            (iv) Powdered opium;3            (v) Granulated opium;4            (vi) Tincture of opium;5            (vii) Codeine;6            (viii) Ethylmorphine;7            (ix) Etorphine Hydrochloride;8            (x) Hydrocodone;9            (xi) Hydromorphone;10            (xii) Metopon;11            (xiii) Morphine;12            (xiii.5) 6-Monoacetylmorphine; 13            (xiv) Oxycodone;14            (xv) Oxymorphone;15            (xv.5) Tapentadol; 16            (xvi) Thebaine;17            (xvii) Thebaine-derived butorphanol.18            (xviii) Methorphan, except drug products 19        containing dextromethorphan that may be dispensed 20        pursuant to a prescription order of a practitioner and 21        are sold in compliance with the safety and labeling 22        standards as set forth by the United States Food and 23        Drug Administration, or drug products containing 24        dextromethorphan that are sold in solid, tablet, 25        liquid, capsule, powder, thin film, or gel form and 26        which are formulated, packaged, and sold in dosages   SB1773 Engrossed- 87 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        and concentrations for use as an over-the-counter drug 2        product. For the purposes of this Section, 3        "over-the-counter drug product" means a drug that is 4        available to consumers without a prescription and sold 5        in compliance with the safety and labeling standards 6        as set forth by the United States Food and Drug 7        Administration. 8        (2) Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative or 9    preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or 10    identical with any of the substances referred to in 11    subparagraph (1), but not including the isoquinoline 12    alkaloids of opium;13        (3) Opium poppy and poppy straw;14        (4) Coca leaves and any salt, compound, isomer, salt 15    of an isomer, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves 16    including cocaine or ecgonine, and any salt, compound, 17    isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is 18    chemically equivalent or identical with any of these 19    substances, but not including decocainized coca leaves or 20    extractions of coca leaves which do not contain cocaine or 21    ecgonine (for the purpose of this paragraph, the term 22    "isomer" includes optical, positional and geometric 23    isomers);24        (5) Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of 25    poppy straw in either liquid, solid or powder form which 26    contains the phenanthrine alkaloids of the opium poppy).  SB1773 Engrossed- 88 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 2another schedule any of the following opiates, including their 3isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, whenever 4the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is 5possible within the specific chemical designation, dextrorphan 6excepted:7        (1) Alfentanil;8        (1.1) Carfentanil;9        (1.2) Thiafentanyl; 10        (2) Alphaprodine;11        (3) Anileridine;12        (4) Bezitramide;13        (5) Bulk Dextropropoxyphene (non-dosage forms);14        (6) Dihydrocodeine;15        (7) Diphenoxylate;16        (8) Fentanyl;17        (9) Sufentanil;18        (9.5) Remifentanil;19        (10) Isomethadone;20        (11) (Blank);21        (12) Levorphanol (Levorphan);22        (13) Metazocine;23        (14) Methadone;24        (15) Methadone-Intermediate, 25    4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4,4-diphenyl-1-butane;26        (16) Moramide-Intermediate, SB1773 Engrossed- 89 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    2-methyl-3-morpholino-1,1-diphenylpropane-carboxylic 2    acid;3        (17) Pethidine (meperidine);4        (18) Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 5    4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;6        (19) Pethidine-Intermediate-B, 7    ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate;8        (20) Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 9    1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid;10        (21) Phenazocine;11        (22) Piminodine;12        (23) Racemethorphan;13        (24) (Blank);14        (25) Levo-alphacetylmethadol (some other names: 15    levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, LAAM).16    (d) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 17another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 18preparation which contains any quantity of the following 19substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous 20system:21        (1) Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts 22    of its optical isomers;23        (2) Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of 24    its isomers;25        (3) Phenmetrazine and its salts;26        (4) Methylphenidate;  SB1773 Engrossed- 90 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (5) Lisdexamfetamine. 2    (e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 3another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 4preparation which contains any quantity of the following 5substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous 6system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers 7whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of 8isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:9        (1) Amobarbital;10        (2) Secobarbital;11        (3) Pentobarbital;12        (4) Pentazocine;13        (5) Phencyclidine;14        (6) Gluthethimide;15        (7) (Blank). 16    (f) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 17another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 18preparation which contains any quantity of the following 19substances:20        (1) Immediate precursor to amphetamine and 21    methamphetamine:22            (i) Phenylacetone23        Some trade or other names: phenyl-2-propanone;24        P2P; benzyl methyl ketone; methyl benzyl ketone.25        (2) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine:26            (i) 1-phenylcyclohexylamine;  SB1773 Engrossed- 91 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1            (ii) 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC).2        (3) Nabilone.3(Source: P.A. 100-368, eff. 1-1-18.) 4    (720 ILCS 570/208)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1208)5    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-881)6    Sec. 208. (a) The controlled substances listed in this 7Section are included in Schedule III.8    (b) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 9another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 10preparation which contains any quantity of the following 11substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous 12system, including its salts, isomers (whether optical 13position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever 14the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is 15possible within the specific chemical designation;16        (1) Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in 17    dosage unit form containing any stimulant substances 18    listed in Schedule II which compounds, mixtures, or 19    preparations were listed on August 25, 1971, as excepted 20    compounds under Title 21, Code of Federal Regulations, 21    Section 308.32, and any other drug of the quantitative 22    composition shown in that list for those drugs or which is 23    the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of 24    controlled substances;25        (2) Benzphetamine;  SB1773 Engrossed- 92 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (3) Chlorphentermine;2        (4) Clortermine;3        (5) Phendimetrazine.4    (c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 5another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 6preparation which contains any quantity of the following 7substances having a potential for abuse associated with a 8depressant effect on the central nervous system:9        (1) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing 10    amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital or any salt 11    thereof and one or more other active medicinal ingredients 12    which are not listed in any schedule;13        (2) Any suppository dosage form containing 14    amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital or any salt of 15    any of these drugs and approved by the Federal Food and 16    Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppository;17        (3) Any substance which contains any quantity of a 18    derivative of barbituric acid, or any salt thereof:19        (3.1) Aprobarbital;20        (3.2) Butabarbital (secbutabarbital);21        (3.3) Butalbital;22        (3.4) Butobarbital (butethal); 23        (4) Chlorhexadol;24        (5) Methyprylon;25        (6) Sulfondiethylmethane;26        (7) Sulfonethylmethane;  SB1773 Engrossed- 93 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (8) Sulfonmethane;2        (9) Lysergic acid;3        (10) Lysergic acid amide;4        (10.1) Tiletamine or zolazepam or both, or any salt of 5    either of them.6    Some trade or other names for a tiletamine-zolazepam 7    combination product: Telazol. 8    Some trade or other names for Tiletamine: 9    2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexanone. 10    Some trade or other names for zolazepam: 11    4-(2-fluorophenyl)-6,8-dihydro-1,3,8-trimethylpyrazolo- 12    [3,4-e], [1,4]-diazepin-7(1H)-one, and flupyrazapon.13        (11) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 14    containing not more than 12.5 milligrams of pentazocine or 15    any of its salts, per 325 milligrams of aspirin;16        (12) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 17    containing not more than 12.5 milligrams of pentazocine or 18    any of its salts, per 325 milligrams of acetaminophen;19        (13) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 20    containing not more than 50 milligrams of pentazocine or 21    any of its salts plus naloxone HCl USP 0.5 milligrams, per 22    dosage unit;23        (14) Ketamine;24        (15) Thiopental. 25    (d) Nalorphine.26    (d.5) Buprenorphine.   SB1773 Engrossed- 94 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 2another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 3preparation containing limited quantities of any of the 4following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the 5free anhydrous base or alkaloid, as set forth below:6        (1) not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 7    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 8    unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline 9    alkaloid of opium;10        (2) not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 11    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 12    unit, with one or more active non-narcotic ingredients in 13    recognized therapeutic amounts;14        (3) (blank);15        (4) (blank);16        (5) not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per 100 17    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 18    unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in 19    recognized therapeutic amounts;20        (6) not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 21    100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage 22    unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in 23    recognized therapeutic amounts;24        (7) not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 25    milliliters or per 100 grams, or not more than 25 26    milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active,   SB1773 Engrossed- 95 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic 2    amounts;3        (8) not more than 50 milligrams of morphine per 100 4    milliliters or per 100 grams with one or more active, 5    non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic 6    amounts.7    (f) Anabolic steroids, except the following anabolic 8steroids that are exempt:9        (1) Androgyn L.A.;10        (2) Andro-Estro 90-4;11        (3) depANDROGYN;12        (4) DEPO-T.E.;13        (5) depTESTROGEN;14        (6) Duomone;15        (7) DURATESTRIN;16        (8) DUO-SPAN II;17        (9) Estratest;18        (10) Estratest H.S.;19        (11) PAN ESTRA TEST;20        (12) Premarin with Methyltestosterone;21        (13) TEST-ESTRO Cypionates;22        (14) Testosterone Cyp 50 Estradiol Cyp 2;23        (15) Testosterone Cypionate-Estradiol Cypionate 24    injection; and25        (16) Testosterone Enanthate-Estradiol Valerate 26    injection.  SB1773 Engrossed- 96 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    (g) Hallucinogenic substances.2        (1) Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and 3    encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a U.S. Food and 4    Drug Administration approved product. Some other names for 5    dronabinol: (6aR-trans)-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro- 6    6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6H-dibenzo (b,d) pyran-1-ol) or 7    (-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol.8        (2) (Reserved).9    (h) The Department may except by rule any compound, 10mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or depressant 11substance listed in subsection (b) from the application of all 12or any part of this Act if the compound, mixture, or 13preparation contains one or more active medicinal ingredients 14not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central 15nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in 16combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that 17vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a 18stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous system.19(Source: P.A. 100-368, eff. 1-1-18.) 20    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-881)21    Sec. 208. (a) The controlled substances listed in this 22Section are included in Schedule III.23    (b) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 24another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 25preparation which contains any quantity of the following   SB1773 Engrossed- 97 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous 2system, including its salts, isomers (whether optical 3position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever 4the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is 5possible within the specific chemical designation;6        (1) Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in 7    dosage unit form containing any stimulant substances 8    listed in Schedule II which compounds, mixtures, or 9    preparations were listed on August 25, 1971, as excepted 10    compounds under Title 21, Code of Federal Regulations, 11    Section 308.32, and any other drug of the quantitative 12    composition shown in that list for those drugs or which is 13    the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of 14    controlled substances;15        (2) Benzphetamine;16        (3) Chlorphentermine;17        (4) Clortermine;18        (5) Phendimetrazine.19    (c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 20another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 21preparation which contains any quantity of the following 22substances having a potential for misuse associated with a 23depressant effect on the central nervous system:24        (1) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing 25    amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital or any salt 26    thereof and one or more other active medicinal ingredients   SB1773 Engrossed- 98 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    which are not listed in any schedule;2        (2) Any suppository dosage form containing 3    amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital or any salt of 4    any of these drugs and approved by the Federal Food and 5    Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppository;6        (3) Any substance which contains any quantity of a 7    derivative of barbituric acid, or any salt thereof:8        (3.1) Aprobarbital;9        (3.2) Butabarbital (secbutabarbital);10        (3.3) Butalbital;11        (3.4) Butobarbital (butethal); 12        (4) Chlorhexadol;13        (5) Methyprylon;14        (6) Sulfondiethylmethane;15        (7) Sulfonethylmethane;16        (8) Sulfonmethane;17        (9) Lysergic acid;18        (10) Lysergic acid amide;19        (10.1) Tiletamine or zolazepam or both, or any salt of 20    either of them.21    Some trade or other names for a tiletamine-zolazepam 22    combination product: Telazol. 23    Some trade or other names for Tiletamine: 24    2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexanone. 25    Some trade or other names for zolazepam: 26    4-(2-fluorophenyl)-6,8-dihydro-1,3,8-trimethylpyrazolo- SB1773 Engrossed- 99 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    [3,4-e], [1,4]-diazepin-7(1H)-one, and flupyrazapon.2        (11) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 3    containing not more than 12.5 milligrams of pentazocine or 4    any of its salts, per 325 milligrams of aspirin;5        (12) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 6    containing not more than 12.5 milligrams of pentazocine or 7    any of its salts, per 325 milligrams of acetaminophen;8        (13) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation 9    containing not more than 50 milligrams of pentazocine or 10    any of its salts plus naloxone HCl USP 0.5 milligrams, per 11    dosage unit;12        (14) Ketamine;13        (15) Thiopental; . 14        (16) Xylazine. 15    (d) Nalorphine.16    (d.5) Buprenorphine. 17    (e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in 18another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 19preparation containing limited quantities of any of the 20following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the 21free anhydrous base or alkaloid, as set forth below:22        (1) not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 23    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 24    unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline 25    alkaloid of opium;26        (2) not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100   SB1773 Engrossed- 100 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 2    unit, with one or more active non-narcotic ingredients in 3    recognized therapeutic amounts;4        (3) (blank);5        (4) (blank);6        (5) not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per 100 7    milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage 8    unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in 9    recognized therapeutic amounts;10        (6) not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 11    100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage 12    unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in 13    recognized therapeutic amounts;14        (7) not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 15    milliliters or per 100 grams, or not more than 25 16    milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, 17    non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic 18    amounts;19        (8) not more than 50 milligrams of morphine per 100 20    milliliters or per 100 grams with one or more active, 21    non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic 22    amounts.23    (f) Anabolic steroids, except the following anabolic 24steroids that are exempt:25        (1) Androgyn L.A.;26        (2) Andro-Estro 90-4;  SB1773 Engrossed- 101 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (3) depANDROGYN;2        (4) DEPO-T.E.;3        (5) depTESTROGEN;4        (6) Duomone;5        (7) DURATESTRIN;6        (8) DUO-SPAN II;7        (9) Estratest;8        (10) Estratest H.S.;9        (11) PAN ESTRA TEST;10        (12) Premarin with Methyltestosterone;11        (13) TEST-ESTRO Cypionates;12        (14) Testosterone Cyp 50 Estradiol Cyp 2;13        (15) Testosterone Cypionate-Estradiol Cypionate 14    injection; and15        (16) Testosterone Enanthate-Estradiol Valerate 16    injection.17    (g) Hallucinogenic substances.18        (1) Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and 19    encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a U.S. Food and 20    Drug Administration approved product. Some other names for 21    dronabinol: (6aR-trans)-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro- 22    6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6H-dibenzo (b,d) pyran-1-ol) or 23    (-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol.24        (2) (Reserved).25    (h) The Department may except by rule any compound, 26mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or depressant   SB1773 Engrossed- 102 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1substance listed in subsection (b) from the application of all 2or any part of this Act if the compound, mixture, or 3preparation contains one or more active medicinal ingredients 4not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central 5nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in 6combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that 7vitiate the potential for misuse of the substances which have 8a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous 9system.10(Source: P.A. 103-881, eff. 1-1-25.) 11    (720 ILCS 570/309.1 new)12    Sec. 309.1. Xylazine exemptions. Notwithstanding the 13scheduling of xylazine as a Schedule III controlled substance, 14xylazine shall not be considered a controlled substance when:15        (1) used by licensed Illinois veterinarians dispensing 16    or prescribing for, or administering to, a nonhuman 17    species of a drug containing xylazine that has been 18    approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration;19        (2) used by licensed Illinois veterinarians dispensing 20    or prescribing for, or administering to, a nonhuman 21    species that is permissible under the Federal Food, Drug, 22    and Cosmetic Act;23        (3) manufactured, distributed, or used as an active 24    pharmaceutical ingredient for manufacturing an animal drug 25    approved under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;  SB1773 Engrossed- 103 -LRB104 03029 RLC 13047 b1        (4) used by a licensed certified euthanasia technician 2    employed by a certified euthanasia agency; or3        (5) used by a wildlife biologist engaged in legal or 4    authorized fieldwork under the indirect supervision of a 5    veterinarian. 6    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 7changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 8that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 9represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 10not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 11made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 12Public Act. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 141, 2026.